Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB283.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 216.313 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 216.310 to 216.360:
(1) "Hospital" means a place devoted primarily to the maintenance and operation of
facilities for the diagnosis, treatment, or care, for more than twenty-four (24) hours,
of two (2) or more nonrelated individuals suffering from illness, disease, injury,
deformity, or a place including nursing and convalescent homes and all institutions
for the care of the sick, devoted primarily to providing, for more than twenty-four
(24) hours, obstetrical or other medical or nursing care for two (2) or more
nonrelated individuals;
(2) "District" means hospital district;
(3) "Board" means the governing body of a hospital district;
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or
his or her designee; and
(5) "Medical service area" means the geographic territory from which patients come or
are expected to come to existing or proposed health facilities as defined by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/24/2025 2:09 PM Jacketed